Hawaii statutes.
[§488-9] Records and reports. (a)
The commissioner shall preserve in permanent form records and reports of the
commissioner's proceedings, hearings, investigations, and examinations and
shall file the records in the commissioner's office.

(b) The commissioner's records and filings in
the commissioner's office shall be open to public inspection, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter.

(c) The commissioner shall maintain the
confidentiality of any documents or information received from the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, the federal government, insurance
regulatory agencies of foreign countries, or insurance departments of other
states, territories, and commonwealths that are confidential in the
jurisdiction of origin. Documents and records subject to this subsection shall
be confidential and privileged, shall not be made public, shall not be subject
to subpoena or discovery, and shall not be admissible as evidence in any
private civil action, and neither the commissioner nor any other person who
received documents, materials, or other information subject to this subsection
while acting under the authority of the commissioner shall be permitted or
required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential
documents, materials, or information subject to this subsection.

This subsection shall not be construed to limit
the commissioner's authority to use any necessary documents, materials, or
other information in furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as
part of the commissioner's official duties. The commissioner may share
information, including otherwise confidential information, with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, the federal government, insurance
regulatory agencies of foreign countries, or insurance departments of other
states, territories, and commonwealths if the statutes or regulations of the
jurisdiction receiving the information require the receiving person or entity
to maintain the same level of confidentiality as required under this subsection
and other applicable law.

(d) The commissioner shall not disclose any
information that is protected from disclosure by law other than as provided in
subsection (c). [L 2011, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next